Maryland, session 2025, HB1198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
3–301.
(a) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Commissioner shall operate a
comprehensive rehabilitative prerelease unit for women that:
(1) is a separate structure in which the services specified in § 3–303(b) of
this subtitle are provided;
(2) has security features for female incarcerated individuals who:
(i) present the least risk of violence;
(ii) present the least risk of escape; and
(iii) have a record of satisfactory institutional behavior; and
(3) matches security level on a validated gender–responsive risk measure.
(b) [(1) In determining where to place a prerelease unit for women, the
Commissioner shall determine into which area, defined by zip codes, the largest percentage
of incarcerated individuals will likely be released.
(2)] A prerelease unit for women shall be:
(1) located in [or adjacent to the zip codes identified in paragraph (1) of this
subsection] BALTIMORE CITY ON A SITE THAT IS NOT LESS THAN 3 ACRES IN LAND
AREA; AND
(2) ABLE TO ACCOMMODATE NOT FEWER THAN THE LARGEST
NUMBER OF WOMEN WHO WERE ELIGIBLE FOR PRERELEASE STATUS IN CALENDAR
YEAR 2023 AS REPORTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ITS OCTOBER 2024 REPORT TO
THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE
APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE.

HOUSE BILL 1198 3
(c) An incarcerated individual assigned to a prerelease unit for women may have
access to the community for any purpose described in § 3–305(a) of this subtitle.
(d) The Department shall:
(1) identify a location, acquire property, and design a site plan for the
prerelease unit for women on or before [June 1, 2021] DECEMBER 31, 2025;
(2) begin construction or renovation of the facility on or before [September
1, 2021] JULY 1, 2026; and
(3) begin operating and providing services in the facility on or before June
1, [2023] 2027.
3–303.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Evidence–based programs and practices” has the meaning stated in §
6–119 of this article.
(3) “GENDER–RESPONSIVE SERVICES” MEANS PROGRAMS THAT
RECOGNIZE AND ACCOUNT FOR THE DIFFERENCES BETWEEN MEN AND WOMEN IN
PSYCHOLOGICAL DEVELOPMENT, SOCIALIZATION, CULTURE, EXPOSURE TO
TRAUMA, LIFE EXPERIENCES, AND CRIMINOGENIC RISKS TO SUPPORT SUCCESSFUL
REENTRY, RECOVERY, AND RECIDIVISM REDUCTION.
(4) “Innovative programs and practices” has the meaning stated in § 6–119
of this article.
(b) The Commissioner shall make evidence–based and gender–responsive
services available to ALL female incarcerated individuals WITH PRERELEASE STATUS
AND ALL FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS at the prerelease unit for women
required under § 3–301 of this subtitle.
(c) The comprehensive rehabilitative prerelease services shall utilize
evidence–based programs and practices and innovative programs and practices to:
(1) assist female incarcerated individuals in improving their education,
upgrading vocational skills, and obtaining suitable employment through classes to earn
industry certification or community college credits, workforce training, and job placement;
(2) provide female incarcerated individuals with the opportunity to
strengthen family and community relationships through extended family leave, parenting
workshops, and family reunification assistance;

HOUSE BILL 1198
(3) provide integrative and gender–responsive services, including medical
treatment, trauma–informed counseling, mental health treatment, and substance use
disorder treatment to address overall health and trauma needs and help female
incarcerated individuals achieve stable and productive roles in society; [and]
(4) develop individualized and comprehensive reentry plans involving
community provider partnerships for female incarcerated individuals to reduce barriers to
obtaining housing, jobs, education, health care, childcare and child welfare, transportation,
legal advocacy, case management, and other needs;
(5) ENSURE FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS AT THE
PRERELEASE UNIT FOR WOMEN ARE SCREENED FOR PUBLIC HEALTH BENEFITS
ELIGIBILITY AND ASSIST WITH PUBLIC HEALTH BENEFITS APPLICATIONS;
(6) ENSURE THAT EACH FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AT THE
PRERELEASE UNIT FOR WOMEN HAS SECURED STABLE HOUSING THAT IS
REASONABLY EXPECTED TO REMAIN AVAILABLE TO THE INDIVIDUAL AND HER
DEPENDENTS FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR AFTER RELEASE;
(7) ENGAGE FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS IN EDUCATION,
TRAINING, OR EMPLOYMENT ACTIVITIES TO PREPARE THE INDIVIDUAL TO HAVE
APPROPRIATE AND SUFFICIENT INCOME TO LIVE INDEPENDENTLY AFTER RELEASE;
AND
(8) ENSURE THE INDIVIDUAL HAS PERTINENT DOCUMENTS,
INCLUDING A BIRTH CERTIFICATE, A SOCIAL SECURITY CARD, HEALTH INSURANCE
INFORMATION, MEDICAL RECORDS, AND A DRIVER’S LICENSE OR STATE
IDENTIFICATION CARD AT RELEASE.
(D) THE COMPREHENSIVE REHABILITATIVE SERVICES REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED AT THE PRERELEASE UNIT FOR WOMEN AND MAY
NOT REQUIRE THAT A FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OBTAIN SERVICES AT:
(1) A DIFFERENT FACILITY FOR WOMEN;
(2) A FACILITY THAT TREATS OR HOUSES BOTH MALE AND FEMALE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS; OR
(3) A FACILITY THAT HOUSES INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS THAT ARE
NOT ELIGIBLE FOR PRERELEASE STATUS.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
IMPLEMENT COMPREHENSIVE REHABILITATIVE PRERELEASE SERVICES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1198 5
(2) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE SOCIAL WORK UNIT
WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY A DETAILED OVERVIEW OF THE COMPREHENSIVE REHABILITATIVE
PRERELEASE SERVICES PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING:
(I) GOALS AND OUTCOMES OF THE PROGRAMS;
(II) THE NUMBER OF PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT BELIEVES IS
RELEVANT TO EVALUATING THE BENEFITS AND EFFECTIVENESS OF
COMPREHENSIVE REHABILITATIVE PRERELEASE SERVICES OFFERED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(F) OF THE FUNDS RECEIVED FROM THE PERFORMANCE INCENTIVE
GRANT FUND ESTABLISHED IN § 9–3209 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, UP
TO $500,000 MAY BE USED FOR COSTS TO IMPLEMENT COMPREHENSIVE
REHABILITATIVE PRERELEASE SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before June 1, 2026, the
Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services shall provide an update on the
progress of construction of the Prerelease Unit for Women to the Senate Judicial
Proceedings Committee and the House Judiciary Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.